Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2 Hospital Care for Nonresident Indigents

31-8-30.
Findings; purpose of article.

The General Assembly finds that there is an inequitable distribution of the public costs incurred in providing health care for indigent persons who receive such care outside their counties of residence. The publicly supported hospitals providing such health care are frequently not reimbursed for the costs thereby incurred, which either increases the tax burden of citizens supporting such hospitals or increases the charges made to paying patients or causes a combination of both types of such increases. It is the purpose of this article to recognize and provide for the state’s responsibility to assist in the payment of cost of care for nonresident indigent patients by providing procedures for the reimbursement of such costs from state funds.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2301a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1234, § 1.

31-8-31.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Area of operation” shall, for the purpose of hospital authorities, have the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of Code Section 31-7-71 and, for purposes of all other hospitals, shall be the county in which the hospital is located.

“Cost of care” means the cost of services rendered by a hospital at the reimbursement rate currently in effect for the hospital under the medical assistance program for the needy under Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.A. Section 1396, et seq.), as amended, but shall not include any portion of such cost which is paid by the indigent patient, by the spouse or a relative of the indigent patient, by insurance, or by any governmental or other public agency pursuant to any federal, state, or local program paying cost of health care for indigent patients, other than the program established by this article.

(2.1)

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Fiscal year” means the period beginning on July 1 of each year and ending on June 30 of the immediately following year.

“Fund” means the Nonresident Indigent Health Care Fund created by Code Section 31-8-33.

“Health care” means the following services for nonresident inpatients and outpatients:

Emergency care or treatment;

Treatment for conditions of pregnancy and treatment of the newborn infant from the time of birth until the time of discharge from the hospital;

Treatment for a potentially disabling illness or injury when treatment for such illness or injury is not available for indigent patients in the county of residence of the patient; and

Treatment for any combination of the foregoing.

“Hospital” means a hospital which is permitted to operate by the department pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 7 of this title.

“Hospital authority” means a hospital authority created pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 7 of this title.

“Indigent patient” means a nonresident patient who is certified as an indigent pursuant to Code Section 31-8-32.

“Nonresident patient” means a person who receives health care from a hospital and who is a resident of this state but who is not a resident of the area of operation of the hospital providing such health care.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2302a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-9/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-8-32.
Determination of indigency.

The commissioner of community health shall adopt state-wide standards to determine indigency for the purposes of this article. To the extent practicable, such standards shall be based on similar standards adopted for the purpose of determining the ability to pay of patients receiving services in state hospitals as authorized by state law, as now or hereafter enacted, governing responsibility for payment of cost of care for health care services rendered by state hospitals.

Within 30 days after receiving the standards provided by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the governing authority of each county, by resolution, shall designate a person, to be known as the health care advisory officer of the county, to make a determination of indigency for the residents of the county in accordance with the standards promulgated pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section. The health care advisory officer shall carry out such additional duties as may be assigned to him by the governing authority of the county. It shall be the duty of the governing authority of each county to mail a copy of such resolution to the chief administrative officer of each hospital within 15 days after its adoption. The governing authority of any county may change the person designated as the health care advisory officer, but any such change shall be accomplished by resolution of the governing authority, and a copy of the resolution making such change shall be mailed to the chief administrative officer of each hospital within 15 days after its adoption.

When a nonresident patient receives health care from a hospital and when such patient claims inability to pay cost of care because of indigency, the chief administrative officer of the hospital shall notify, in writing, the health care advisory officer of the county of residence of the patient. Such notification shall request a determination of indigency of the patient. As soon as practicable after receiving such notification but not later than 30 days thereafter, the health care advisory officer of the county shall notify the chief administrative officer of the hospital of his determination. If the health care advisory officer determines that the patient is indigent, such notification shall constitute a certification of such indigency, and the expenditures for cost of care of such nonresident indigent patient shall be maintained on the records of the hospital for the purposes of Code Section 31-8-34.

If the health care advisory officer of a county fails to respond to a request for a determination of indigency from a hospital providing health care for such patient within the time limitation provided by subsection (c) of this Code section, the county of residence of the patient shall be liable for the payment of cost of care of such patient. In such event, the hospital providing health care for the nonresident patient may bill the county of residence of the patient for the amount of his cost of care, and it shall be the duty of the governing authority of such county to pay the hospital the amount billed.

To the end that the certifications of indigency required by subsection (c) of this Code section may be expedited, it shall be the duty of each county health care advisory officer to establish and maintain files showing the names of county residents determined to be indigent.

It shall be the duty of the commissioner to devise such standard forms as may be necessary or desirable to administer this Code section uniformly. It shall be the duty of counties, health care advisory officers, and hospitals to use the forms promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2303a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228.

31-8-33.
Creation of fund.

There is created the Nonresident Indigent Health Care Fund for the purpose of making payments therefrom to hospitals to reimburse such hospitals for the cost of care of nonresident indigent patients. Such fund shall be made up of appropriations made thereto by the General Assembly, as provided in this article.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2304a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31.

31-8-34.
Maintenance of records; certification of cost of care; determination of amount of fund.

Each hospital shall maintain accurate records of its cost of care for providing health care services for nonresident indigent patients. As soon as practicable after the close of each quarter of each fiscal year and within not more than 30 days after the close thereof, the chief administrative officer of each hospital shall certify to the commissioner the total cost of care incurred by the hospital in providing health care to nonresident indigent patients for the immediately preceding quarter.

For the 1980-81 fiscal year, the commissioner shall estimate the state-wide cost of care for nonresident indigent patients by annualizing the total amount shown on the first quarterly submissions to him under subsection (a) of this Code section of cost of care for nonresident indigent patients and by adjusting the annualized amount by a factor, not to exceed 10 percent of such amount, which the commissioner determines to be a reasonable estimate of anticipated increases in the cost of care for nonresident indigent patients.

For the 1981-82 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the commissioner shall estimate the state-wide cost of care for nonresident indigent patients by annualizing the total payments, as provided by Code Section 31-8-35, to hospitals from the fund during the first quarter of the immediately preceding fiscal year, adjusted by a factor which, based on the experience of the fund, the commissioner determines to be a reasonable estimate of anticipated increases or decreases in the cost of care for nonresident indigent patients; but no estimated increase in such cost shall exceed 10 percent of the annualized amount.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2305a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1234, § 1.

31-8-35.
Payments from fund to hospitals.

For each fiscal year, beginning with the 1980-81 fiscal year, payments to hospitals for cost of care of nonresident indigent patients shall be made from the fund. Beginning with the certifications made after the close of the first quarter of the 1980-81 fiscal year, the quarterly certifications of cost of care for nonresident indigent patients made by hospitals pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 31-8-34 shall constitute requests for payments from the fund to reimburse such hospitals for the cost of care. Within 30 days after receiving any such request, the commissioner shall authorize the state treasurer to issue a check to the hospital submitting the request for the payment from the fund of the amount requested.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2307a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296.

31-8-36.
State appropriations to fund.

For each fiscal year, beginning with the 1980-81 fiscal year, the commissioner shall make a request for appropriation of the amount determined under Code Section 31-8-34 as the state-wide cost of care for nonresident indigent patients in the budget of the Department of Community Health under the category: “Nonresident Indigent Health Care Fund.” The budget shall cite this article as the authority for such request and shall make such additional explanation of the request as the commissioner deems appropriate.

In the event the General Assembly fails to appropriate funds in accordance with the budget request made pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section or fails to appropriate the full amount requested, the payments to hospitals under Code Section 31-8-35 shall be reduced pro rata in accordance with the amount actually available to the fund.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2306a, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1234, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

31-8-37.
Compliance with this article contingent upon appropriation.

On and after July 1, 1987, hospitals shall not be required to comply with the provisions of this article unless the General Assembly appropriates funds in an amount determined as the state-wide cost of care for nonresident indigent patients as provided for in Code Section 31-8-36.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-8-37

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1494, § 3.